Arkansas, session 2025, SB38.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
ACUPUNCTURE AND RELATED TECHNIQUES. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas State Board of
Acupuncture and Related Techniques for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $2,999
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
*MAH017*
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(C) PROF. FEES 8,001
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $11,000

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - STATE BOARD OF EXAMINERS OF
ALCOHOLISM AND DRUG ABUSE COUNSELORS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Health - State Board of
Examiners of Alcoholism and Drug Abuse Counselors for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $7,400
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 566
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 10,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 14,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $31,966

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
ATHLETIC TRAINING. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas State Board of
Athletic Training for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $480
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 37
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 20,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $20,517

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
CHIROPRACTIC EXAMINERS. There is hereby established for the Department of
Health - Arkansas State Board of Chiropractic Examiners for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) L091C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF I 1 GRADE GS08
(2) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
CHIROPRACTIC EXAMINERS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas State Board of
Chiropractic Examiners for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $91,815
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 35,643
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 60,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 2,500
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(C) PROF. FEES 12,672
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $202,630

SECTION 6. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS BOARD OF EXAMINERS
IN COUNSELING. There is hereby established for the Department of Health -
Arkansas Board of Examiners in Counseling for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N176N ADH EXEC DIR COUNSELING BD 1 GRADE GS11
(2) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(3) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4

SECTION 7. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN COUNSLING.
There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Health - Arkansas Board of
Examiners in Counseling for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN
COUNSELING. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas Board of Examiners in
Counseling for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $225,143
(02) EXTRA HELP 4,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 84,472
(04) OVERTIME 12,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 113,800
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,000
(C) PROF. FEES 11,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $454,415

SECTION 9. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
DENTAL EXAMINERS. There is hereby established for the Department of Health -
Arkansas State Board of Dental Examiners for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X027C ADH DENTAL EXAMINERS BD EXEC DIR 1 GRADE GS10
(2) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF DENTAL
EXAMINERS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas State Board of Dental
Examiners for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $155,097
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 48,708
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 119,637
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 7,166
(C) PROF. FEES 42,126
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $372,734

SECTION 11. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS DIETETICS
LICENSING BOARD. There is hereby established for the Department of Health -
Arkansas Dietetics Licensing Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) L091C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF I 1 GRADE GS08
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS DIETETICS LICENSING
BOARD. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas Dietetics Licensing Board for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $47,260
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 18,775
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 5,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $71,035

SECTION 13. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS BOARD OF
DISPENSING OPTICIANS. There is hereby established for the Department of
Health - Arkansas Board of Dispensing Opticians for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) L091C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF I 1 GRADE GS08
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1

SECTION 14. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS BOARD OF DISPENSING OPTICIANS. There
is hereby authorized, for the Department of Health - Arkansas Board of
Dispensing Opticians for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS BOARD OF DISPENSING
OPTICIANS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the Board of Dispensing Opticians' Fund, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas Board of
Dispensing Opticians for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $49,750
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,200
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 18,943
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 23,900
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 200
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $93,993

SECTION 16. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS BOARD OF HEARING INSTRUMENT
DISPENSERS. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Health -
Arkansas Board of Hearing Instrument Dispensers for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: two (2) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS BOARD OF HEARING
INSTRUMENT DISPENSERS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas Board of
Hearing Instrument Dispensers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXTRA HELP $30,200
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,328
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 17,800
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 350
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $50,678

SECTION 18. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE MEDICAL
BOARD. There is hereby established for the Department of Health - Arkansas
State Medical Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U134U ADH EXEC DIR AR STATE MEDICAL BD 1 GRADE SE01
(2) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(3) D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(4) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 2 GRADE IT04
(5) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(6) R019C BUDGET MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(7) X030C REGULATORY BOARD CHIEF INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(8) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
(9) E046C TRAINING INSTRUCTOR 1 GRADE GS06
(10) G187C CREDENTIALING COORDINATION SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS05
(11) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(12) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(13) C045C LICENSING COORDINATOR 16 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 34

SECTION 19. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS STATE MEDICAL BOARD. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Health - Arkansas State Medical Board for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE MEDICAL BOARD.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Health - Arkansas State Medical Board for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,493,519
(02) EXTRA HELP 24,500
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 584,328
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,379,645
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 19,000
(C) PROF. FEES 21,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 7,500
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,529,492

SECTION 21. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
NURSING. There is hereby established for the Department of Health - Arkansas
State Board of Nursing for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U096U ADH ASBN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 GRADE MP04
(3) L009C NURSE MANAGER 3 GRADE MP03
(4) L026C ADH NURSING PROGRAM COORD 2 GRADE MP02
(5) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(6) D084C COMPUTER OPERATOR 1 GRADE IT02
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(7) G013N ADH ASBN GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS12
(8) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(9) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(10) X030C REGULATORY BOARD CHIEF INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(11) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(12) P013C PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(13) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(14) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(15) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(16) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS04
(17) C045C LICENSING COORDINATOR 6 GRADE GS04
(18) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 2 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 30

SECTION 22. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF NURSING.
There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Health - Arkansas State
Board of Nursing for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable
from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-
time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in
the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this
act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
NURSING. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the State Board of Nursing Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas State Board of
Nursing for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,982,888
(02) EXTRA HELP 5,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 689,775
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,040,914
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 43,448
(C) PROF. FEES 2,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 1,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,765,025

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF NURSING - SCHOLAR
LOANS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health - Arkansas
State Board of Nursing, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
the Nursing Student Loan Program to make student loans for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) NURSING STUDENT LOAN PROGRAM $100,000

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF NURSING - NURSING
EDUCATION WORKSHOPS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses
of the Department of Health - Arkansas State Board of Nursing - Nursing
Education Workshops for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $14,325
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 2,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $16,325

SECTION 26. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF NURSING - ARKANSAS
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
CENTER FOR NURSING GRANT. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Health - Arkansas State Board of Nursing, to be payable from the State Board
of Nursing Fund, for a grant for personal services and operating expenses for
the Arkansas Center for Nursing for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS CENTER FOR NURSING GRANT $173,000

SECTION 27. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - STATE BOARD OF OPTOMETRY.
There is hereby established for the Department of Health - State Board of
Optometry for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) L091C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF I 1 GRADE GS08
(2) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - STATE BOARD OF OPTOMETRY.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Health - State Board of Optometry for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $110,887
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 40,545
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 32,000
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 35,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $218,432

SECTION 29. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
PHARMACY. There is hereby established for the Department of Health -
Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N001N ADH DIRECTOR OF PHARMACY BOARD 1 GRADE MP08
(2) L015N ADH ASST PHARMACY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE MP07
(3) L107C ADH ASBP PHARMACIST INSPECTOR 3 GRADE MP06
(4) G041N ADH ASPB GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS13
(5) A023C ADH PHARMACY BOARD CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS10
(6) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(7) D087C DATABASE COORD/BUSINESS LIC. ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 10

SECTION 30. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Health for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: four (4) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 31. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
PHARMACY. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health -
Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy, to be payable from the cash fund deposited
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Health -
Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,259,530
(02) EXTRA HELP 30,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 362,617
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 586,985
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 29,120
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 3,000
(06) IMPAIRED PHARMACIST PROGRAM 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,321,252

SECTION 32. APPROPRIATION ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY - PHARMACY
STUDENT LOANS AND SCHOLARSHIPS. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for grants
to colleges of pharmacy in Arkansas for pharmacy student loans and
scholarships of the Department of Health - Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(1) PHARMACY STUDENT LOAN/SCHOLARSHIPS $400,000

SECTION 33. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
PHYSICAL THERAPY. There is hereby established for the Department of Health -
Arkansas State Board of Physical Therapy for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X050C ADH PHYSICAL THERAPY BD EXEC DIR 1 GRADE GS08
(2) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 34. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF
PHYSICAL THERAPY. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health,
to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas State Board of
Physical Therapy for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $118,146
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 42,672
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 89,833
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 8,490
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $259,141

SECTION 35. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE BOARD OF PHYSICAL THERAPY -
SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for a scholarship
program of the Department of Health - Arkansas State Board of Physical
Therapy for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM $200,000

SECTION 36. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS BOARD OF PODIATRIC
MEDICINE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas Board of Podiatric Medicine
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,800
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 138
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 4,052
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 250
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,240

SECTION 37. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS PSYCHOLOGY BOARD.
There is hereby established for the Department of Health - Arkansas
Psychology Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) L091C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF I 1 GRADE GS08
(2) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 38. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS PSYCHOLOGY BOARD.
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Health - Arkansas Psychology Board for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $92,890
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 37,177
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 61,540
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,000
(C) PROF. FEES 24,727
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $219,334

SECTION 39. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS PSYCHOLOGY BOARD - SCHOLARSHIP
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health -
Arkansas Psychology Board, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
scholarships for psychology students pursing training as psychological and
neurological technicians for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PSYCHOLOGY STUDENT SCHOLARSHIPS $150,000

SECTION 40. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS SOCIAL WORK LICENSING BOARD.
There is hereby established for the Department of Health - Arkansas Social
Work Licensing Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) X135C ADH SOCIAL WORK LICENSING BD EXEC DI 1 GRADE GS08
(2) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 41. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS SOCIAL WORK LICENSING BOARD. There
is hereby authorized, for the Department of Health - Arkansas Social Work
Licensing Board for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number
of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable
from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-
time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in
the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this
act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 42. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS SOCIAL WORK LICENSING
BOARD. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the Social Work Licensing Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas Social Work
Licensing Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $116,308
(02) EXTRA HELP 6,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 41,609
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 42,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,000
(C) PROF. FEES 7,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 500
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $219,417

03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
SECTION 43. REGULAR SALARIES - BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN SPEECH-LANGUAGE
PATHOLOGY AND AUDIOLOGY. There is hereby established for the Department of
Health - Board of Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) L059C ADH ABSLPA DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS08
(2) C072C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2

SECTION 44. EXTRA HELP - BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN SPEECH-LANGUAGE
PATHOLOGY AND AUDIOLOGY. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of
Health - Board of Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: one (1) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 45. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN SPEECH-
LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY AND AUDIOLOGY. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Health, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Health - Board of
Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $98,930
(02) EXTRA HELP 12,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 39,482
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 50,516
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,250
(C) PROF. FEES 12,800
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $216,978

SECTION 46. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS SPINAL CORD COMMISSION. There
is hereby established for the Department of Health - Arkansas Spinal Cord
Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) D057C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGER 1 GRADE IT05
(2) U006U ADH EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SPINAL CORD C 1 GRADE GS12
(3) M013C ADH SPINAL CORD COMN CLIENT SVS ADMI 1 GRADE GS09
(4) A050C AGENCY FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(5) L098C CERTIFIED VOCATIONAL REHAB COUNSELOR 7 GRADE GS08
(6) M026C LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER 1 GRADE GS07
(7) L051C REHABILITATION COUNSELOR 9 GRADE GS06
(8) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(9) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 3 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 25

SECTION 47. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS SPINAL CORD COMMISSION - STATE
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas Spinal Cord
Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,235,581
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 488,362
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 219,888
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,620
(C) PROF. FEES 19,065
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) LONG TERM ATTENDANT CARE 261,610
(05) SPINAL TREATMENT PROGRAM 772,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,012,126

SECTION 48. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS SPINAL CORD
COMMISSION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Health - Arkansas
Spinal Cord Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $20,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,000
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $28,000

SECTION 49. APPROPRIATION - CASH - ARKANSAS SPINAL CORD COMMISSION.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Health, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of
Health - Arkansas Spinal Cord Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $40,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 10,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $50,000

SECTION 50. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
STATE BOARD OF CHIROPRACTIC EXAMINERS - INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES FOR CONSUMER
COMPLAINTS. Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of the available appropriation in
the Professional Fees Line item of this act shall be made available to the
board for the purpose of contracting an independent or private investigator
for investigative services regarding complaints submitted by consumers.
(a)(1) The Arkansas State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall contract
with an outside investigator as needed to perform investigations and conduct
inspections of alleged wrongdoing.
(2) An outside investigator contracted under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section shall have expertise or background in the subject matter in
which he or she is being contracted to investigate.
(b) The duties of an investigator hired under this section shall
include without limitation investigation and inspection of all complaints, as
determined by the board, to determine whether a person has:
(1) Practiced his or her profession in such a way as to endanger the general
health and welfare of the public; or
(2) Otherwise violated this chapter or rules of the board.
(c)(1) The board shall file a report annually on or before December 1
with the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the
House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs for the
committees' review.
(2) The report shall include:
(A) The number of complaints that have been filed;
(B) A list of who has been investigated and the purported
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
violation; and
(C) A summary of the findings of each investigation.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 51. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
STATE BOARD OF DENTAL EXAMINERS - EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS. The Arkansas State
Board of Dental Examiners is hereby authorized to expend from monies
authorized herein, $15 from each licensed dentist licensed by the State Board
of Dental Examiners each year to be paid by the Arkansas State Board of
Dental Examiners to 501(c)(3) Arkansas foundations that have healthcare
professionals on their board and provide for identification, treatment and
monitoring of healthcare professionals who suffer from alcohol or drug abuse
problems, in order to promote the public health and safety and to insure the
continued availability of skilled and highly trained dental professionals for
the benefit of the public.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 52. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
STATE MEDICAL BOARD - EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS. The State Medical Board is hereby
authorized to expend from monies authorized herein, $30 from each licensed
physician licensed by the State Medical Board each year to be paid by the
State Medical Board to 501(c)(3) Arkansas foundations that have healthcare
professionals on their board and provide for identification, treatment and
monitoring of healthcare professionals who suffer from alcohol or drug abuse
problems, in order to promote the public health and safety and to insure the
continued availability of skilled and highly trained medical professionals
for the benefit of the public.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 53. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
STATE BOARD OF NURSING - FUNDING TRANSFER. The Arkansas State Board of
Nursing may request a fund transfer in an amount not to exceed one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) each fiscal year from the State Board of Nursing
Fund to the cash in State Treasury fund as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State to provide funds for the Student Loan Program
appropriation provided herein. Upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, the amount requested shall be transferred on his or her books and
those of the State Treasurer and the Auditor of State.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 30,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 54. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
BOARD OF PODIATRIC MEDICINE - EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS. The Arkansas Board of
Podiatric Medicine is hereby authorized to expend from monies authorized
herein, $10 from each licensed podiatrist licensed by the Arkansas Board of
Podiatric Medicine each year to be paid by the Arkansas Board of Podiatric
Medicine to 501(c)(3) Arkansas foundations that have healthcare professionals
on their board and provide for identification, treatment and monitoring of
healthcare professionals who suffer from alcohol or drug abuse problems, in
order to promote the public health and safety and to insure the continued
availability of skilled and highly trained podiatric professionals for the
benefit of the public.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 55. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ARKANSAS SPINAL CORD COMMISSION - LINE ITEM TRANSFER. Any savings made in the
State Appropriation may, after receiving advice and approval of the
Department of Finance and Administration, be transferred to the Spinal
Treatment Program.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 56. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
OF FUNDS. Immediately upon the effective date of this act, the Arkansas
State Medical Board shall transfer annually the sum of five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000), or so much as is available, from the unobligated and
unallocated monies remaining in the Arkansas State Medical Board's cash
funds, to the Department of Education - Division of Higher Education's
Graduate Medical Education Fund to be used exclusively for the Graduate
Medical Education Residency Expansion Board appropriation.

SECTION 57. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 58. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 59. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB38
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee































03-10-2025 15:55:41 MAH017